Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB4078.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 1, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-187.02, to read: START_STATUTE15-187.02. Charter schools; administrators; employment contracts; posting requirements; searchable database; annual report A. Each charter school governing body shall submit to the state board for charter schools both of the following: 1. Either: (a) A copy of the employment contract, including any extension or amendment to the contract, for each individual who has been employed by the charter school during the preceding five school years as the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator. (b) An attestation stating that the charter school has not employed a chief financial officer or school administrator during the preceding five school years. 2. Either: (a) A copy of the employment contract, including any extension or amendment to the contract, for each individual who is currently employed as the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator not later than thirty days after the date on which the charter school entered into the contract or approved the extension or amendment to the contract. (b) An affidavit stating that the employment contract of the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator, as applicable, is the same as the employment contract that the charter school submitted for the immediately preceding year.  an affidavit submitted pursuant to this subdivision must be submitted not later than thirty days after the anniversary of the date on which the charter school entered into the contract. B. The state board for charter schools shall: 1. Post all contracts that are submitted pursuant to subsection A of this section on the state board's website.  The state board may not remove a contract that is posted pursuant to this subsection until at least five years after the date on which the employment of the chief financial officer or school administrator is terminated.  The state board may redact personally identifiable information that is exempt from public disclosure as a matter of law before posting an employment contract on the state board's website. 2. Create a searchable online database that is posted on the state board's website and that contains, at a minimum, the following information from each contract that is submitted pursuant to subsection a of this section: (a) The charter school's name. (b) The base salary for the chief financial officer OR the highest-ranking school administrator who is employed by the charter school. (c) The total amount of performance based pay that the charter school governing body awards to the chief financial officer OR the highest-ranking school administrator. (d) The total amount of employer contributions for retirement benefits for the chief financial officer OR the highest-ranking school administrator. (e) The total amount of stipends paid to the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator, disaggregated by the purpose or type of stipend. (f) The total hours of personal leave and paid time off that are awarded to the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator. (g) Whether the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator is entitled to payment for unused personal leave and paid time off. (h) The total amount of employer contributions for health insurance premiums for the spouse and dependents of the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator. (i) The total amount of employer contributions for life insurance for the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator. C. Each charter school governing body shall post on the charter school's website a copy of each contract and attestation that the governing body submits to the state board pursuant to subsection A of this section.  A charter school may not remove a contract that is posted pursuant to this subsection until at least five years after the date on which the employment of the chief financial officer or school administrator is terminated.  A charter school may redact personally identifiable information that is exempt from public disclosure as a matter of law before posting an employment contract on the charter school's website. D. On or before December 1 of each year, the state board for charter schools shall compile a report that includes all of the following information for each charter school in this state and shall post the report on the state board's website: 1. The base salary of the chief financial officer or the highest-ranking school administrator. 2. A list of all employee benefits that the chief financial officer or highest-ranking school administrator may receive pursuant to the individual's employment contract, including, if applicable, the monetary value of each benefit. 3. If the chief financial officer or highest-ranking school administrator has a car allowance under the individual's employment contract, the amount of the allowance. END_STATUTE